Illinois, session 104th, SB39.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Electric Vehicle Charging Act is amended by 5changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 1085/10)7    Sec. 10. Applicability. 8    (a) For the purposes of Sections 20 and 25, this Act 9applies to newly constructed single-family homes and 10multifamily residential buildings that have parking spaces and 11are constructed after the effective date of this Act.12    (b) For the purposes of Sections 30 and 35, this Act 13applies to unit owners, tenants, landlords, and associations 14of both newly constructed and existing single-family homes and 15multifamily residential buildings that have parking spaces. 16    (c) The provisions of this Act do not apply to any tiny 17home constructed for veterans who are homeless or at risk of 18homelessness and in need of secure, long-term affordable 19housing, if that tiny home is constructed by a nonprofit 20organization described in Section 501(c)(3) or Section 21501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 that 22exclusively funds and administers projects and services for 23veterans. Every county and municipality that has the power to   SB0039 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 03697 KTG 13721 b1issue building permits and otherwise control the construction 2of buildings shall require by ordinance that an applicant 3seeking a building permit to construct tiny homes for at-risk 4veterans must include with the permit application a completed 5and signed affidavit stating that all buildings constructed 6under the permit are designated for the exclusive use of 7qualifying veterans who are homeless or at risk of 8homelessness and in need of secure, long-term affordable 9housing. No county or municipality, including a home rule 10unit, shall adopt any building code or ordinance that requires 11EV-capable parking spaces for tiny homes constructed for the 12purpose of providing affordable housing for at-risk veterans 13as provided in this subsection. This subsection is a 14limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of 15the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home 16rule units of powers and functions exercised by the State.17    As used in this subsection:18    "Tiny home" means an individual, detached residential 19dwelling unit of no more than 800 square feet, occupying a lot 20either by itself or sharing a common lot with other tiny homes. 21"Tiny home" does not include a manufactured home as defined in 22the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Rights Act. "Tiny home" 23does not include a single unit in a small multifamily 24residence or a large multifamily residence. 25    "Veteran" means a person who served in and who has 26received an honorable or general discharge from, the United   SB0039 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 03697 KTG 13721 b1States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marines, Coast 2Guard, or reserves thereof, or who served in the Army National 3Guard, Air National Guard, or Illinois National Guard.4(Source: P.A. 103-53, eff. 1-1-24; 103-572, eff. 1-1-24.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.